Washington statutes.
RCW 39.102.140

Reporting requirements. (Expires June 30, 2044.)

(1) A sponsoring local government shall provide a report to the board and the department by March 1st of each year. The report shall contain the following information:

(a) The amount of local excise tax allocation revenues, local property tax allocation revenues, other revenues from local public sources, and taxes under RCW 82.14.475 received by the sponsoring local government, cosponsoring local government, or any participating local government during the preceding calendar year that were dedicated to pay the public improvements financed in whole or in part with local infrastructure financing, and a summary of how these revenues were expended;

(b) The names of any businesses locating within the revenue development area as a result of the public improvements undertaken by the sponsoring local government and financed in whole or in part with local infrastructure financing;

(c) The total number of permanent jobs created in the revenue development area as a result of the public improvements undertaken by the sponsoring local government and financed in whole or in part with local infrastructure financing;

(d) The average wages and benefits received by all employees of businesses locating within the revenue development area as a result of the public improvements undertaken by the sponsoring local government and financed in whole or in part with local infrastructure financing;

(e) That the sponsoring local government is in compliance with RCW 39.102.070; and

(f) Beginning with the reports due March 1, 2010, the following must also be included:

(i) A list of public improvements financed on a pay-as-you-go basis in previous calendar years and by indebtedness issued under this chapter;

(ii) The date when any indebtedness issued under this chapter is expected to be retired;

(iii) At least once every three years, updated estimates of state excise tax allocation revenues, state property tax allocation revenues, and local excise tax increments, as determined by the sponsoring local government, that are estimated to have been received by the state, any participating local government, sponsoring local government, and cosponsoring local government, since the approval of the project award under RCW 39.102.040 by the board; and

(iv) Any other information required by the department or the board to enable the department or the board to fulfill its duties under this chapter and RCW 82.14.475.

(2) The board shall make a report available to the public and the legislature by June 1st of each even-numbered year. The report shall include a list of public improvements undertaken by sponsoring local governments and financed in whole or in part with local infrastructure financing and it shall also include a summary of the information provided to the department by sponsoring local governments under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The department, upon request, must assist a sponsoring local government in estimating the amount of state excise tax allocation revenues and local excise tax increments required in subsection (1)(f)(iii) of this section.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 21 s 5. Prior: 2009 c 518 s 12; 2009 c 267 s 5; 2007 c 229 s 9; 2006 c 181 s 403.]

NOTES:

Application—Severability—2007 c 229: See notes following RCW 39.102.020.